North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55D. Filings, Names, and Registered Agents for Corporations, Nonprofit Corporations, and Partnerships.
Article 2. Submission of Documents to the Secretary of State for Filing.

§ 55D-10.
Filing requirements.

To be entitled to filing by the Secretary of State under Chapter 55, 55A, 55B, 57D, or 59 of the General Statutes, a document must satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section of the General Statutes that adds to or varies these requirements.

The document must meet all of the following requirements:

The document must be one that is required or permitted by Chapter 55, 55A, 55B, 57D, or 59 of the General Statutes to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

The document must contain the information required by Chapter 55, 55A, 55B, 57D, or 59 of the General Statutes for that document. It may contain other information as well.

The document must be typewritten, printed, or in an electronic form acceptable to the Secretary of State.

The document must be in the English language. A name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals, and the certificate of existence or a document of similar import required of foreign corporations, foreign nonprofit corporations, foreign limited liability companies, and foreign limited liability partnerships need not be in English if accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

A document submitted by an entity must be executed by a person authorized to execute documents (i) under

G.S. 55-1-20

if the entity is a domestic or foreign corporation, (ii) under

G.S. 55A-1-20

if the entity is a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation, (iii) under

G.S. 57D-1-20

if the entity is a domestic or foreign limited liability company, (iv) under

G.S. 59-204

if the entity is a domestic or foreign limited partnership, or (v) under

G.S. 59-35.1

if the entity is any other partnership as defined in

G.S. 59-36

whether or not formed under the laws of the State.

The person executing the document must sign it and state beneath or opposite the person’s signature, the person’s name, and the capacity in which the person signs. Any signature on the document may be a facsimile or an electronic signature in a form acceptable to the Secretary of State. The document may but need not contain a seal, attestation, acknowledgment, verification, or proof.

If the Secretary of State has prescribed a mandatory form for the document, the document must be in or on the prescribed form.

The document must be delivered to the office of the Secretary of State for filing and must be accompanied by the applicable fees.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1967, c. 13, s. 1; c. 823, s. 16; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.1(a); 1991, c. 645, s. 15; 1999-369, s. 1.1; 2001-358, ss. 3(a), 4; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2013-157, s. 7.

Former Official Comment to

G.S. 55-1-20

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under

G.S. 55-1-20

prior to its amendment in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Section 1.20 standardizes the filing requirements for all documents required or permitted by the Model Act to be filed with the secretary of state. In a few instances, other sections of the Act impose additional requirements which must also be complied with if the document in question is to be filed. Section 1.20 relates only to documents which the Model Act expressly requires or permits to be filed with the secretary of state; it does not authorize or direct the secretary of state to accept or reject for filing other documents relating to corporations and does not treat documents required or permitted to be filed under other statutes.

The purposes of the filing requirements of chapter 1 are: (1) to simplify the filing requirements by the elimination of formal or technical requirements that serve little purpose, (2) to minimize the number of pieces of paper to be processed by the secretary of state, and (3) to eliminate all possible disputes between persons seeking to file documents and the secretary of state as to the legal efficacy of documents.

The requirements of section 1.20 may be summarized as follows:

Form

Execution

Contents

Number of copies

To be eligible for filing, a document must be typed or printed and in the English language (except to the limited extent permitted by section 1.20(e)). The secretary of state is not authorized to prescribe forms (except to the extent permitted by section 1.21) and as a result may not reject documents on the basis of form (see section 1.25) if they contain the information called for by the specific statutory requirement and meet the minimal formal requirements of this section.

To be filed a document must simply be executed by a corporate officer. Section 1.21(f). No specific corporate officer is designated as the appropriate officer to sign though the signing officer must designate his office or the capacity in which he signs the document. Among the officers who are expressly authorized to sign a document is the chairman of the board of directors, a choice that may be appropriate if the corporation has a board of directors but has not appointed officers. If a corporation has not been formed or has neither officers nor a board of directors, an incorporator may execute the document.

The requirement in earlier versions of the Model Act and in many state statutes that documents must be acknowledge or verified as a condition for filing has been eliminated. These requirements serve little purpose in connection with documents filed under corporation statutes. (See in this connection section 1.29, which makes it a criminal offense for any person to sign a document for filing with knowledge that it contains false information.) On the other hand, many organizations, like lenders or title companies, may desire that specific documents include acknowledgments, verifications, or seals; section 1.21(g) therefore provides that the addition of these forms of execution does not affect the eligibility of the document for filing.

A document must be filed by the secretary of state if it contains the information required by the Model Act. The document may contain additional information or statements and their presence is not ground for the secretary of state to reject the document for filing. These documents must be accepted for filing even though the secretary of state believes that the language is illegal or unenforceable. In view of this very limited discretion granted to secretaries of state under this section, section 1.25(d) defines the secretary of state’s role as “ministerial” and provides that no inference or presumption arises from the fact that the secretary of state accepted a document for filing. See the Official Comments to sections 1.25 and 1.30.

Section 1.20(i) requires that a document filed with the secretary of state must be accompanied by “one exact or conformed copy.” The requirement in early versions of the Model Act and in many state statutes that “duplicate originals” (each being executed as an original document) be submitted has been eliminated. Under section 1.20(i) an “exact” copy is a reproduction of the executed original document by photographic or xerographic process; a “conformed” copy is a copy on which the existence of signatures is entered or noted on the copy. The substitution of exact or conformed copies for duplicate originals reflects advances in the art of office copying machines that permit the routine reproduction of exact copies of executed documents. However, a person submitting “duplicate originals” meets the requirement of this section since the secretary of state may treat the duplicate original as a “conformed copy.” The reasons for requiring an exact or conformed copy of a filed document to accompany the signed original, and the processing of these documents by the secretary of state, are discussed in the Official Comment to section 1.25.

Former North Carolina Commentary to

G.S. 55-1-20

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under

G.S. 55-1-20

prior to its amendment in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

This section differs from prior law in three minor substantive respects. First, former G.S. 55-4(a) (2) required the signatures of two specified officers, whereas this section requires only one and permits incorporators or fiduciaries to sign in appropriate circumstances. Second, former G.S. 55-4(a) (3) required verification except where acknowledgment was otherwise required, whereas the present section permits either verification or acknowledgment but does not require either. Third, former G.S. 55-4(a) (6) required delivery of a copy of the document to the register of deeds of the county in which the corporation’s registered office was located; the new statute does not.

Because subsection (g) does not require verification or acknowledgment,

G.S. 55-1-29

makes it a criminal offense for any person to sign a document for filing with knowledge that it contains false information. Other leading states, such as Delaware, do not require the acknowledgment or verification of corporate documents for filing, apparently without any problems. Finally, it does not appear that third parties can be injured by the elimination of the requirement of acknowledgment or verification. Third parties are entitled to rely on what is on file in the Secretary of State’s office and are only charged with notice of any limitations on corporate powers expressly stated in the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

This section differs from the corresponding section of the Model Act in three minor respects. First, the addition of the language “under this Act” in subsection (a) makes it clear that the subsection is referring to documents filed under this Act and not other filings such as UCC filings and securities law filings. Second, subsection (b) was rewritten for stylistic consistency. Third, subsection (i) limits the Model Act’s requirement that a document presented for filing be accompanied by any franchise tax, license fee, or penalty required by this Act or other law
whether or not
related to the filing. The North Carolina version limits the necessary payments to those required by the Act and thus continues the former North Carolina practice.

§ 55D-11.
Expedited filings.

A person submitting a document for filing may request an expedited filing only at the time the document is submitted. The Secretary of State shall guarantee the expedited filing of the document if the document is in proper form and accompanied by all applicable fees, including the following fee:

Two hundred dollars ($200.00) for the filing by the end of the same business day of a document received by 12:00 noon; or

One hundred dollars ($100.00) for the filing of a document within 24 hours after receipt, excluding weekends and holidays.

The Secretary of State shall not collect the fees allowed in this section unless the person submitting the document for filing is informed by the Secretary of State of the fees prior to the filing of the document.

History.

1995, c. 539, s. 1; 2001-358, ss. 3(b), 4; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2001-358, ss. 3(b) and 4, effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to documents submitted for filing on or after that date, recodified

G.S. 55-1-22

.1 as this section; rewrote the first paragraph; substituted “noon; or” for “noon Eastern Standard Time; and” at the end of subdivision (1); and deleted “requests an expedited filing and” preceding “is informed” in the last paragraph.

§ 55D-12.
Advisory review of documents.

Upon request, the Secretary of State shall review a document prior to its submission for filing to determine whether it satisfies applicable filing requirements. Submission of a document for review shall be accompanied by a fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00) and shall be in accordance with procedures adopted by rule by the Secretary of State. The advisory review shall be completed within 24 hours after submission, excluding weekends and holidays, unless the person submitting the document is otherwise notified in accordance with procedures adopted by rule by the Secretary of State fixing priority between submissions under this section and filings under

G.S. 55D-11

. Upon completion of the advisory review, the Secretary of State shall notify the person submitting the document of any deficiencies in the document that would prevent its filing.

History.

1997-485, s. 6; 2001-358, ss. 3(b), 4; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2001-358, ss. 3(b) and 4, effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to documents submitted for filing on or after that date, recodified

G.S. 55-1-22

.2 as this section; in the first sentence, substituted “review” for “provide for the review of” and substituted “applicable filing requirements” for “the requirements of this Chapter”; substituted “a fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00)” for “the proper fee” in the second sentence; and substituted “G.S. 55D-11” for “G.S. 55-1-22.1” in the next to last sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 389.

§ 55D-13.
Effective time and date of document.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section and in

G.S. 55D-14

, a document accepted for filing is effective:

At the time of filing on the date it is filed, as evidenced by the Secretary of State’s date and time endorsement on the filed document; or

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is effective at 11:59:59 P.M. on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the 90th day after the date it is filed.

Except as provided in G.S. 55-2-03(b), 55A-2-03(b), and 57D-2-20(b), the fact that a document has become effective under this section does not determine its validity or invalidity or the correctness or incorrectness of the information contained in the document.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1967, c. 13, s. 1; c. 823, s. 16; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 552, s. 1; 2001-358, ss. 3(b), 4; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2013-157, s. 8.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-1-23

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-1-23 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Section 1.23(a) provides that documents accepted for filing become effective at the time and date of filing, or at another specified time on that date, unless a delayed effective date is selected under section 1.23(b). This section gives express statutory authority to the common practice of most secretaries of state of ignoring processing time and treating a document as effective as of the date it is submitted for filing even though it may not be reviewed and accepted for filing until several days later.

Section 1.23(a) requires secretaries of state to maintain a date and time stamp for recording the receipt of documents and provides that documents become effective at the stamped time on the date of filing. This provision should eliminate any doubt about situations involving same-day transactions in which documents, for example articles of merger, are filed on the morning of the date the merger is to become effective. Section 1.23(a) contemplates that the time of filing, as well as the date, will be routinely recorded.

Section 1.23(b) provides an alternative method of establishing the effective date of a document. The document itself may fix as its effective date any date within 90 days after the date it is filed; it may also fix the time it becomes effective on that date. If no time is specified, the document becomes effective as of the close of business on the specified date. The Model Act also allows the effective date fixed in a document to be corrected to a limited extent. See the Official Comment to section 1.24.

Section 1.23(b) does not authorize or contemplate the retroactive establishment of an effective date before the date of filing.

North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-1-23

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-1-23 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

This section differs from prior law in three respects. First, it increases from 20 to 90 days the maximum time by which the effective date of a filed document may be delayed. Second, it specifies a time of day (11:59:59 P.M.) for the effectiveness of documents that specify a delayed effective date but no time. Third, it deletes reference to a penalty for a failure to
deliver documents to the register of deeds, since that requirement no longer exists.

This section differs in two respects from the Model Act. First, it specifies 11:59:59 P.M. (rather than the close of business) as the time of effectiveness of documents that specify a delayed effective date but no time. Second, it makes explicit in subsection (c) the limited effect of the Secretary of State’s acceptance of documents for filing. This is probably implicit under the Model Act.
See
North Carolina Comment to G.S. 55-1-25(d),

infra.

§ 55D-14.
Correcting filed document.

A person on whose behalf a document was filed in the Office of the Secretary of State may correct that document if it (i) contains a statement that is incorrect and was incorrect when filed or (ii) was defectively executed, attested, sealed, verified, or acknowledged.

A document is corrected by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of correction that do all of the following:

Describe the document (including its filing date) or have attached to them a copy of the document.

Specify the incorrect statement and the reason it is incorrect or the nature of the defect.

Correct the incorrect statement or defect.

Articles of correction are effective as of the effective time and date of the document they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when filed.

History.

1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1997-485, s. 14; 2001-358, ss. 3(b), 4; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-1-24

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-1-24 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Section 1.24 permits making corrections in filed documents without refiling the entire document or submitting formal articles of amendment. This correction procedure has two advantages: (1) filing articles of correction may be less expensive than refiling the document or filing articles of amendment, and (2) articles of correction do not alter the effective date of the underlying document being corrected. Indeed, under section 1.24(c), even the correction relates back to the original effective date of the document except as to persons relying on the original document and adversely affected by the correction. As to these persons, the effective date of articles of correction is the date the articles are filed.

A document may be corrected either because it contains an “incorrect statement” or because it was defectively executed (including defects in optional forms of execution that do not affect the eligibility of the original document for filing).

A provision in a document setting an effective date (section 1.23) may be corrected under this section, but the corrected effective date must comply with section 1.23 measured from the date of the original filing of the document being corrected, i.e. it cannot be before the date of filing of the document or more than 90 days thereafter.

North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-1-24

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-1-24 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

This section has no counterpart in prior law.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2001-358, ss. 3(b) and (4), effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to documents submitted for filing on or after that date, recodified G.S. 55-1-24 as this section; rewrote subsections (a) and (b); and substituted “as of the effective time and date” for “on the effective date” in subsection (c).

§ 55D-15.
Filing duty of Secretary of State.

If a document delivered to the office of the Secretary of State for filing satisfies the requirements of this Chapter and of Chapter 55, 55A, 55B, 57D, or 59 of the General Statutes, the Secretary of State shall file it. Documents filed with the Secretary of State under this Chapter may be maintained by the Secretary either in their original form or in photographic, microfilm, optical disk media, or other reproduced form. The Secretary may make reproductions of documents filed under this Chapter, or under any predecessor law, by photographic, microfilm, optical disk media, or other means of reproduction, and may destroy the originals of those documents reproduced.

The Secretary of State files a document by endorsing “Filed”, together with the Secretary’s name and official title and the date and time of filing, on the document. After filing a document, the Secretary of State shall deliver a document copy to the person submitting the document for filing and as provided in

G.S. 55D-32

.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document, the Secretary shall return it to the person submitting the document for filing within five days after the document was received, together with a written statement of the date of the refusal and a brief explanation of the reason for refusal. The Secretary of State may correct apparent errors and omissions on a document submitted for filing if authorized to make the corrections by the person submitting the document for filing.

The Secretary of State’s duty is to review and file documents that satisfy the requirements of this Chapter and of Chapter 55, 55A, 55B, 57D, or 59 of the General Statutes. The Secretary of State’s filing or refusing to file a document does not do any of the following:

Except as provided in G.S. 55-2-03(b), 55A-2-03(b), or 57D-2-20(b), affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or part.

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document.

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1967, c. 13, s. 1; c. 823, s. 16; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.2; 1993, c. 552, s. 2; 1995, c. 539, s. 2; 2001-358, ss. 3(b), 4, 46; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2013-157, s. 9.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-1-25

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-1-25 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Filing duty in general

Mechanics of filing

Elimination of certificates of incorporation and similar documents

Rejection of document by secretary of state

Under section 1.25 the secretary of state is required to file a document if it “satisfies the requirements of section 1.20.” This language should be contrasted with earlier versions of the Model Act (and many state statutes) that required the secretary of state to ascertain whether the document “conformed with law” before filing it. The purpose of this change is to limit the discretion of the secretary of state to a ministerial role in reviewing the contents of documents. If the document submitted is in the form prescribed and contains the information required by section 1.20 and the applicable provision of the Model Act, the secretary of state under section 1.25 must file it even though it contains additional provisions the secretary of state may feel are irrelevant or not authorized by the Model Act or by general legal principles. Consistently with this approach, section 1.25(d) states that the filing duty of the secretary of state is ministerial and provides that filing a document with the secretary of state does not affect the validity or invalidity of any provision contained in the document and does not create any presumption with respect to any provision. Persons adversely affected by provisions in a document may test their validity in a proceeding appropriate for that purpose. Similarly, the attorney general of the state may also question the validity of provisions of documents filed with the secretary of state in an independent suit brought for that purpose; in neither case should any presumption or inference be drawn about the validity of the provision from the fact that the secretary of state accepted the document for filing.

Section 1.25(b) provides that when the secretary of state files a document, he stamps or endorses it as filed, retains the signed original document for his records, and returns the exact or conformed copy (which must accompany the document under section 1.20(i)) to the corporation or its representative with the secretary of state’s fee receipt or acknowledgement of receipt if no fee is required. This will establish that a document has been filed in the form of the copy. Consideration was given to dispensing with the document copy entirely and providing only for the return of a fee receipt or equivalent document. Several states currently follow this practice with respect to articles of incorporation and other documents. It was felt to be important, however, to continue a practice by which each corporation receives back from the secretary of state for its records a document that on its face shows that it is an exact conformed copy of the document that was filed with the secretary of state. This copy is usually placed in the minute book and is available for informal inspection without requiring a person to examine the records of the secretary of state. Of course, a person desiring a certified copy of any filed document may obtain it from the office of the secretary of state by paying the fee prescribed in section 1.22(c).

Section 1.25(b) provides that acceptance of articles of incorporation or other documents is evidenced merely by the issuance of a fee receipt or acknowledgement of receipt if no fee is required. Earlier versions of the Model Act and the statutes of many states provided that acceptance by the secretary of state is evidenced by a “certificate” (e.g., of incorporation, of merger, or of amendment). This older practice was not retained in the revised Model Act because it was felt desirable to reduce the number of pieces of paper issued by the secretary of state. Under the older practice most state offices routinely issued both fee receipts and certificates. A single document—the fee receipt or acknowledgment—should sufficiently indicate that the document has been accepted for filing, and in fact many states in recent years have dispensed with the formal certificate.

Because of the simplification of formal filing requirements and the limited discretion granted to the secretary of state by the Model Act, it is probable that rejection of documents for filing will occur only rarely. Section 1.25(c) provides that if the secretary of state does reject a document for filing he must return it to the corporation or its representative within five days together with a brief written explanation of his reason for rejection. This rejection may be the basis of judicial review under section 1.26.

North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-1-25

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-1-25 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Former G.S. 55-4(a) (5) required the Secretary of State to file a document unless it did not “conform to law.” Although this section omits the filing standard of former G.S. 55-4(a) (5) — that a document shall be filed only if it “conforms to law” — the drafters rejected the Official Comment’s suggestion that there is a conflict between the Secretary of State’s ministerial filing duty under section 1.25 of the Model Act and his review of a document to determine whether it conforms to law. The drafters intend that the Secretary of State’s office continue the practice under former G.S. 55-4(a) (5) of calling attention to mistakes apparent on the face of a document presented for filing and to inconsistencies between a document presented for filing and other documents previously filed by the same corporation. For example, if a document presented for filing contains a reference (e.g., par value of authorized shares; number of outstanding shares) that, on its face, is inconsistent with the corporation’s articles of incorporation, then the Secretary of State may refuse to file it. Similarly, a document may be refused if, on its face, it shows that the action referred to therein has not been authorized in the manner prescribed by the statute (e.g. no shareholders’ vote on a matter requiring shareholder action). The drafters concluded that continuation of the practice under former G.S. 55-4(a) (5) was necessary to preserve the integrity and reliability of documents on file in the office of the Secretary of State. Accordingly, to clarify their intention, the drafters modified the Model Act in subsection (a) to provide that in order to be filed, a document must satisfy the requirements of “this Chapter.”

The Model Act was modified in subsection (b) to omit the requirement that the Secretary of State provide a filing fee receipt in all cases. However, it is intended that a filing fee receipt will be provided upon request.

The Model Act was also modified in subsection (c) by substituting “received” for “delivered.” “Deliver” is defined in G.S. 55-1-40(5) as including “mail,” which creates an ambiguity as to when the five-day period for returning a document presented for filing begins to run. The modification was made to clarify this point.

Former G.S. 55-169 provided that a certificate issued by the Secretary of State with respect to a document on file in his office constituted prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated. Subsection (d) eliminates that presumption with respect to extrinsic facts in a document on file (e.g. the number of shares issued and outstanding; the number of shares voted on a particular matter). In that respect G.S. 55-1-23(c) was added to make a clear distinction between the word “validity,” as used in subsection (d), and the word “effective” as used elsewhere in the statute. “Validity” refers to the substance and legal sufficiency of a filed document, and “effective” refers only to whether the document has been accepted and become operative under the formal filing procedures of the Act. Subsection (d) was also modified from the Model Act to describe the Secretary of State’s duty under this section instead of merely characterizing it as ministerial.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2001-358, ss. 3(b), (4), and (46), effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to documents submitted for filing on or after that date, recodified G.S. 55-1-25 as this section, and rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2013-157, s. 9, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “57D” for “57C” in the first sentence of subsections (a) and (d); and substituted “57D-2-20(b)” for “57C-2-20(b)” in subdivision (d)(1).

§ 55D-16.
Appeal from Secretary of State’s refusal to file document.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document delivered to the Secretary of State’s office for filing, the person on whose behalf the document was submitted for filing may, within 30 days after the date of the refusal, appeal the refusal to the Superior Court of Wake County. The appeal is commenced by filing a petition with the court and with the Secretary of State requesting the court to compel the Secretary of State to file the document. The petition must have attached to it the document to be filed and the Secretary of State’s explanation for the refusal to file. No service of process on the Secretary of State is required except for the filing of the petition as set forth in this subsection. The appeal to the superior court is not governed by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act, and shall be determined by a judge of the superior court upon such further notice and opportunity to be heard, if any, as the court may deem appropriate under the circumstances.

Upon consideration of the petition and any response made by the Secretary of State, the court may, prior to entering final judgment, order the Secretary of State to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.3; 2001-358, ss. 3(b), 4; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-1-26

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-1-26 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

The court with jurisdiction to hear appeals from the secretary of state

“Summary” orders

Burden of proof and review standard

The identity of the specific court with jurisdiction to hear appeals from the secretary of state under section 1.26 must be supplied by each state when enacting this section. It is intended that this should be a court of general civil jurisdiction. It may either be the court located in the capital of the state or the court in the county where the corporation’s principal business office is located in the state or, if the corporation does not have a principal office in the state, the court located in the county in which its registered office is located. The annual report of the corporation must state where the principal office of the corporation (which need not be within the state) is located. See section 16.22. Other sections of the Model Act also contemplate that the court with jurisdiction over substantive corporate matters will be designated in the statute. See, for example, section 7.03, relating to the ordering of a shareholders’ meeting after the corporation fails to hold such a meeting. It is expected that jurisdiction over litigation with respect to substantive matters will normally be vested in the court in the county of the corporation’s principal or registered office. See the Official Comment to section 7.03.

In view of the limited discretion of the secretary of state under the Act, a “summary” order appears to be appropriate in section 1.26. Throughout the Model Act the term “summarily order” or similar language is used where courts are authorized to order action taken and the person charged with taking the original action has little or no discretion. The word “summary” is not used in a technical sense but to refer to a class of cases where the court might appropriately order that action be taken on the face of the pleadings or after an oral hearing but without any need to resolve disputed factual issues.

The revised Model Act, unlike earlier versions, does not address either the burden of proof or the standard for review in judicial proceedings challenging action of the secretary of state. It is contemplated that these matters will be governed by general principles of judicial review of agency action in each adopting state.

Amended North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-1-26

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-1-26 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

The prior law contained no explicit procedure for appeal from the Secretary of State’s refusal to file a document.

This section varies from the Model Act in that it avoids use of the word “summarily” and instead sets out a specific procedure, in the nature of a petition for a writ of mandamus, which (1) requires the appellant to file a copy of its petition with the Secretary of State, (2) makes it clear that the Administrative Procedure Act does not govern such appeal, and (3) provides that the court may give the Secretary of State further notice and an opportunity to be heard if it chooses to do so. In addition, to clarify that a refusal to file initial articles of incorporation or reservations of corporate names may be appealed pursuant to this section, this section uses the words “person tendering the document for filing” to describe the appellant where the Model Act uses the words “domestic or foreign corporation.”